Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 21. Advanced Nuclear Reactors

History.

2020 ch. 104, § 1, effective March 13, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 104, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2020.

§ 35-11-2101.
Advanced
nuclear reactors; requirements.

Repealed by Laws 2022, ch. 103, § 2.

Any person operating an advanced nuclear reactor in the state of Wyoming in accordance with this section shall not store spent nuclear fuel or high-level radioactive waste from the advanced nuclear reactor on the site of the advanced nuclear reactor without first meeting all of the requirements of the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to affect the authority of the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission.

As used in this section:

“High-level radioactive waste” means as defined in W.S. 35-11-1501(a)(i);

“Public utility” means as defined in W.S. 37-1-101(a)(vi);

“Advanced nuclear reactor” means a nuclear reactor, including any necessary ancillary facilities or structures, that is an improvement over nuclear reactors placed in service before January 1, 2021 and has a license issued by the United States nuclear regulatory commission;

through (C) Repealed by Laws 2022, ch. 103, § 2.

“Spent nuclear fuel” means as defined in W.S. 35-11-1501(a)(iv).

The provisions of the Industrial Development Information and Siting Act, W.S.

35-12-101

through

35-12-119

, shall apply only to the extent that those provisions do not interfere with, contradict or duplicate any requirements of the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission.

Not less than thirty (30) days before construction of an advanced nuclear reactor commences and if no report is required to be submitted under W.S. 35-11-1506(e)(vi), the operator of the advanced nuclear reactor shall submit a report to the department that includes:

The number of jobs that will be created in the planning, licensing, site analysis, preparation, purchasing, construction, transportation, operation and decommissioning of the advanced nuclear reactor and what number of those jobs would be filled by Wyoming residents;

Local and state taxes that are estimated to be generated by all aspects of the construction, operation and decommissioning of the advanced nuclear reactor;

All benefits and impacts that will accrue to the state and local community where the advanced nuclear reactor will be located, including benefits from job training, education, communications systems, monitoring and security systems.

The operator of each advanced nuclear reactor shall send to the department copies of all publicly available reports, notifications and violations sent to or from the United States nuclear regulatory commission or the operator of the advanced nuclear reactor as soon as practicable but not later than five (5) days after the operator sends or receives the report. The operator shall also transmit all information required under this subsection to emergency management departments of the local governments where the facility is located and shall make the information available on a public website.

History.

2020 ch. 104, § 1, effective March 13, 2020; 2022 ch. 103, §§ 1, 2, effective March 21, 2022.

The 2022 amendment,

by ch. 103, §§ 1, 2, in (b), substituted “an advanced” for “a small modular” following “operating,” added “in accordance with this section,” substituted “advanced” for “small modular” twice; rewrote (d)(iii), which read, “‘Small modular nuclear reactor’ means a nuclear reactor that:”; added “only” in (e); added (f); repealed former (a), which read, “After recommendation from the director and consultation with the appropriate advisory boards, the council shall promulgate rules and regulations to authorize the permitting of small modular nuclear reactors for the purpose of generating electricity. Rules promulgated under this subsection shall be subject to the following: (i) Any public utility or person that currently owns a plant, property or facility for the generation of electricity that currently uses coal or natural gas may apply to replace the coal or natural gas generation with generation using small modular nuclear reactors; (ii) The small modular nuclear reactors shall have a combined rated capacity not greater than the current rated capacity at the plant, property or facility using coal or natural gas proposed to be transitioned to a small modular nuclear reactor provided more than one (1) small modular nuclear reactor may be used to replace the current rated capacity at the plant, property or facility to be transitioned; (iii) The small modular nuclear reactor shall be located on the same site as the current plant, property or facility that the small modular nuclear reactor would replace; (iv) A permit shall not be issued under this section until the small modular nuclear reactor has received a license or permit to construct or operate the reactor from the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission; (v) Any reports, notifications and violations sent to or from the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission by or to the proposed operator of the small modular nuclear reactor shall also be submitted to the department”; and repealed former (d)(iii)(A) through (d)(iii)(C), which read, “(A) Has a rated capacity of not more than three hundred (300) megawatts of electricity; (B) Can be constructed and operated in combination with other similar reactors at a single site, if additional reactors are necessary; and (C) Has been licensed by the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission and is in compliance with all requirements and conditions imposed by the commission.”

Laws 2022, ch. 103, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 21, 2022.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 104, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2020.